Utah statutes.
16-10a-1323.   Procedure to demand payment.
(1)  A shareholder who is given a dissenters' notice described in Section
16-10a-1322, who meets the requirements of Section 16-10a-1321, and wishes to
assert dissenters' rights shall, in accordance with the terms of the
dissenters' notice:
(a)  cause the corporation to receive a payment demand, which may be the
payment demand form contemplated in Subsection 16-10a-1322(2)(d), duly
completed, or may be stated in another writing;
(b)  deposit certificates for his certificated shares in accordance with the
terms of the dissenters' notice; and
(c)  if required by the corporation in the dissenters' notice described in
Section 16-10a-1322, as contemplated by Section 16-10a-1327, certify in
writing, in or with the payment demand, whether or not he or the person on
whose behalf he asserts dissenters' rights acquired beneficial ownership of
the shares before the date of the first announcement to news media or to
shareholders of the terms of the proposed corporate action creating
dissenters' rights under Section 16-10a-1302.
(2)  A shareholder who demands payment in accordance with Subsection (1)
retains all rights of a shareholder except the right to transfer the shares
until the effective date of the proposed corporate action giving rise to the
exercise of dissenters' rights and has only the right to receive payment for
the shares after the effective date of the corporate action.
(3)  A shareholder who does not demand payment and deposit share certificates
as required, by the date or dates set in the dissenters' notice, is not
entitled to payment for shares under this part.
